Utah statutes.
58-70a-301.   Licensure required -- License classifications.

(1)  A license is required to engage in practice as a physician assistant, except as specifically provided in Section 58-70a-305 or 58-1-307.

(2)  The division shall issue to a person who qualifies under this chapter a license in the classification of physician assistant.



Enacted by Chapter 229, 1997 General Session

